Utah statutes.
49-16-504.   Benefits payable upon death of retired member.

(1)  If a retiree who retired under either Division A or Division B dies, the retiree's spouse at the time of death shall receive an allowance equal to 75% of the allowance that was being paid to the retiree at the time of death.

(2)  If the retiree retired solely under Division B and dies leaving unmarried children under the age of 21 or dependent unmarried mentally or physically disabled children, the children shall qualify for a benefit as prescribed under Subsection 49-16-502(1)(c) which is payable on the first day of the month following the month in which the retiree died.

